Hawaii statutes.
§431:14-111 Advisory organizations.
(a) Every group, association or other organization of insurers, whether
located within or outside this State, which assists insurers which make their
own filings or rating organizations in ratemaking, by the collection and
furnishing of loss or expense statistics, or by the submission of
recommendations, but which does not make filings under this article, shall be
known as an advisory organization.

(b) Every advisory organization shall file
with the commissioner:

(1) A copy of its constitution, its articles of
agreement or association, or its certificate of incorporation and of its
bylaws, rules and regulations governing its activities;

(2) A list of its members;

(3) The name and address of a resident of this State
upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process issued at the
commissioner's direction may be served; and

(4) An agreement that the commissioner may examine
the advisory organization in accordance with section 431:14-113.

(c) If, after a hearing, the commissioner
finds that the furnishing of such information or assistance by the advisory
organization involved any act or practice which is unfair or unreasonable or
otherwise inconsistent with this article, the commissioner may issue a written order
specifying in what respects the act or practice is unfair or unreasonable or
otherwise inconsistent with this article, and requiring the discontinuance of
the act or practice.

(d) No insurer which makes its own filings,
nor any rating organization, shall support its filings by statistics or adopt
ratemaking recommendations furnished to it by an advisory organization which
has not complied with this section or with an order of the commissioner
involving the statistics or recommendations issued under subsection (c). If
the commissioner finds such insurer or rating organization to be in violation
of this subsection, the commissioner may issue an order requiring the
discontinuance of such violation. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next